North Dakota, session 69, HB1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 28-32-10 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
b. The agency or commission shall request publication of an abbreviated newspaper
publication notice at least once in each official county newspaper published in this state.
The abbreviated newspaper publication of notice, which must be:
(1) Be in a display-type format with a minimum width of one column of approximately
two inches [5.08 centimeters] and a minimum depth of approximately three inches
[7.62 centimeters] and with a headline describing the general topic of the proposed
rules. The notice must also include
(2) Include the telephone number or address to use to obtain a copy of the proposed
rules, identification of the emergency status and declared effective date of any
emergency rules, the address to use and the deadline to submit written comments,
and the location, date, and time of the public hearing on the rules, and a short
description of the general subject matter of the proposed rules submission. The
notice also may include a quick response code providing access to the full notice or
additional information related to the proposed rules at the discretion of the agency
or commission.

H. B. NO. 1355 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1355.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State